Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.060

Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority.

The legislature authorizes the establishment of the Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority, which boundaries are those contained in the Pioneer Square-International district within the city of Seattle.

[ 2007 c 501 s 6.]